Washington statutes.
RCW 35.21.875

Designation of official newspaper.

Each city and town shall designate an official newspaper by resolution. The newspaper shall be of general circulation in the city or town and have the qualifications prescribed by chapter 65.16 RCW.

[ 1985 c 469 s 99.]